dictionaries/uk/index.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY оаниітврсулдкмпяьзчбегхшжєйїцюфщґОАНИІТВРСУЛДКМПЯЬЗЧБЕГХШЖЄЙЇЦЮФЩҐ-'
MAP 1
MAP гґ
WORDCHARS -ʼ'`
BREAK 1
BREAK -
IGNORE ́
ICONV 64
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ’ ' ʼ
ICONV a 0
ICONV b 0
ICONV c 0
ICONV d 0
ICONV e 0
ICONV f 0
ICONV g 0
ICONV h 0
ICONV i 0
ICONV j 0
ICONV k 0
ICONV l 0
ICONV m 0
ICONV n 0
ICONV o 0
ICONV p 0
ICONV q 0
ICONV r 0
ICONV s 0
ICONV t 0
ICONV u 0
ICONV v 0
ICONV x 0
ICONV w 0
ICONV y 0
ICONV z 0
ICONV A 0
ICONV B 0
ICONV C 0
ICONV D 0
ICONV E 0
ICONV F 0
ICONV G 0
ICONV H 0
ICONV I 0
ICONV J 0
ICONV K 0
ICONV L 0
ICONV M 0
ICONV N 0
ICONV O 0
ICONV P 0
ICONV Q 0
ICONV R 0
ICONV S 0
ICONV T 0
ICONV U 0
ICONV V 0
ICONV X 0
ICONV W 0
ICONV Y 0
ICONV Z 0
ICONV é 0
ICONV ô 0
ICONV ï 0
ICONV ü 0
ICONV ç 0
ICONV ñ 0
ICONV ß 0
ICONV ë 0
ICONV ä 0
ICONV ö 0

SFX ! Y 3
SFX ! ь е ь
SFX ! 0 е [бм]
SFX ! 0 е [вжрфчшщ]
SFX " Y 28
SFX " елець ільця елець
SFX " день ня день
SFX " тень ня тень
SFX " 0 я [аиуео]р
SFX " 0 а яр
SFX " оєць ійця боєць
SFX " осен існа осен
SFX " ьок ка рьок
SFX " вець евця [^аеєиіїоуюяг]вець
SFX " нець енця [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець
SFX " рець ерця [^аеєиіїоуюяг]рець
SFX " евець івця евець
SFX " едець ідця едець
SFX " енець інця енець
SFX " епець іпця епець
SFX " ерець ірця ерець
SFX " овець івця овець
SFX " одець ідця одець
SFX " онець інця онець
SFX " опець іпця опець
SFX " орець ірця орець
SFX " елок ілка елок
SFX " овок івка овок
SFX " ід ьода лід
SFX " іл ьола ліл
SFX " ін ьона лін
SFX " ір ьора лір
SFX " іт ьота літ
SFX $ Y 26
SFX $ 0 і [жчшщ]
SFX $ ьо і ьо
SFX $ ьо ів ьо
SFX $ ьо ям ьо
SFX $ ьо ями ьо
SFX $ ьо ях ьо
SFX $ о и [^ь]о
SFX $ о ів [^ь]о
SFX $ о ам [^ь]о
SFX $ о ами [^ь]о
SFX $ о ах [^ь]о
SFX $ й ї й
SFX $ й їв й
SFX $ й ям й
SFX $ й ями й
SFX $ й ях й
SFX $ 0 ів [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ 0 ам [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ 0 ами [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ 0 ах [^аєиіїйоуьюя]
SFX $ ь і ь
SFX $ ь ів ь
SFX $ ь ям ь
SFX $ ь ями ь
SFX $ ь ях ь
SFX $ 0 и [^аєиіїйоуьюяжчшщ]
SFX % Y 22
SFX % кка цці кка
SFX % а і [жчшщ]а
SFX % а ею [жчшщ]а
SFX % ха сі ха
SFX % я і [^іІйеиаоу'ь]я
SFX % я ею [^іІйеиаоу'ь]я
SFX % а и [^жчшщ]а
SFX % а ою [^жчшщ]а
SFX % я ю я
SFX % а у а
SFX % А У А
SFX % А И А
SFX % А ОЮ А
SFX % я ї ['ьйіІеиаоу]я
SFX % я єю ['ьйіІеиаоу]я
SFX % а і [^гГґкхжчшщ]а
SFX % га зі га
SFX % Га Зі Га
SFX % ГА ЗІ ГА
SFX % ґа зі ґа
SFX % ґа дзі ґа
SFX % ка ці [^к]ка
SFX & Y 2
SFX & е і ще
SFX & е ею ще
SFX ' Y 1
SFX ' ти но ти
SFX ( Y 125
SFX ( день ні день
SFX ( тень ні тень
SFX ( день нів день
SFX ( тень нів тень
SFX ( день ням день
SFX ( тень ням тень
SFX ( день нями день
SFX ( тень нями тень
SFX ( день нях день
SFX ( тень нях тень
SFX ( 0 і яр
SFX ( 0 ів яр
SFX ( 0 ам яр
SFX ( 0 ами яр
SFX ( 0 ах яр
SFX ( оєць ійці оєць
SFX ( оєць ійців боєць
SFX ( оєць ійцям боєць
SFX ( оєць ійцями боєць
SFX ( оєць ійцях боєць
SFX ( ьок ки рьок
SFX ( ьок ків рьок
SFX ( ьок кам рьок
SFX ( ьок ками рьок
SFX ( ьок ках рьок
SFX ( 0 і [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ів [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ям [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ями [аеиоу]р
SFX ( 0 ях [аеиоу]р
SFX ( евець івці евець
SFX ( едець ідці едець
SFX ( енець інці енець
SFX ( епець іпці епець
SFX ( ерець ірці ерець
SFX ( овець івці овець
SFX ( одець ідці одець
SFX ( онець інці онець
SFX ( опець іпці опець
SFX ( орець ірці орець
SFX ( евець івців евець
SFX ( едець ідців едець
SFX ( енець інців енець
SFX ( епець іпців епець
SFX ( ерець ірців ерець
SFX ( овець івців овець
SFX ( одець ідців одець
SFX ( онець інців онець
SFX ( опець іпців опець
SFX ( орець ірців орець
SFX ( евець івцям евець
SFX ( едець ідцям едець
SFX ( енець інцям енець
SFX ( епець іпцям епець
SFX ( ерець ірцям ерець
SFX ( овець івцям овець
SFX ( одець ідцям одець
SFX ( онець інцям онець
SFX ( опець іпцям опець
SFX ( орець ірцям орець
SFX ( евець івцями евець
SFX ( едець ідцями едець
SFX ( енець інцями енець
SFX ( епець іпцями епець
SFX ( ерець ірцями ерець
SFX ( овець івцями овець
SFX ( одець ідцями одець
SFX ( онець інцями онець
SFX ( опець іпцями опець
SFX ( орець ірцями орець
SFX ( евець івцях евець
SFX ( едець ідцях едець
SFX ( енець інцях енець
SFX ( епець іпцях епець
SFX ( ерець ірцях ерець
SFX ( овець івцях овець
SFX ( одець ідцях одець
SFX ( онець інцях онець
SFX ( опець іпцях опець
SFX ( орець ірцях орець
SFX ( елок ілки елок
SFX ( елок ілків елок
SFX ( елок ілкам елок
SFX ( елок ілками елок
SFX ( елок ілках елок
SFX ( вець евці [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енці [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерці [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евців [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енців [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерців [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евцям [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енцям [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерцям [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евцями [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енцями [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерцями [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( вець евцях [^аеєиіїоуюягр]вець
SFX ( нець енцях [^аеєиіїоуюягр]нець
SFX ( рець ерцях [^аеєиіїоуюягр]рець
SFX ( ід ьоди лід
SFX ( іл ьоли ліл
SFX ( ін ьони лін
SFX ( ір ьори лір
SFX ( іт ьоти літ
SFX ( ід ьодів лід
SFX ( іл ьолів ліл
SFX ( ін ьонів лін
SFX ( ір ьорів лір
SFX ( іт ьотів літ
SFX ( ід ьодам лід
SFX ( іл ьолам ліл
SFX ( ін ьонам лін
SFX ( ір ьорам лір
SFX ( іт ьотам літ
SFX ( ід ьодами лід
SFX ( іл ьолами ліл
SFX ( ін ьонами лін
SFX ( ір ьорами лір
SFX ( іт ьотами літ
SFX ( ід ьодах лід
SFX ( іл ьолах ліл
SFX ( ін ьонах лін
SFX ( ір ьорах лір
SFX ( іт ьотах літ
SFX ) Y 6
SFX ) атися учись жатися
SFX ) атися учися жатися ###
SFX ) стися дучись ястися
SFX ) стися дучися ястися ###
SFX ) ати учи жати
SFX ) сти дучи ясти
SFX * Y 3
SFX * ік оці ік
SFX * іг озі іг
SFX * іґ озі іґ
SFX + Y 4
SFX + їй йо їй
SFX + ій ьо ій
SFX + ий о [^жчшщ]ий
SFX + ий е [жчшщ]ий
SFX , Y 5
SFX , г зі [гґ]
SFX , г зів [гґ]
SFX , г зям [гґ]
SFX , г зями [гґ]
SFX , г зях [гґ]
SFX - Y 17
SFX - 0 ей [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 ам [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 ами [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 ах [жчшщ]
SFX - 0 ей [ау]р
SFX - 0 ям [ау]р
SFX - 0 ями [ау]р
SFX - 0 ях [ау]р
SFX - 0 і [вф]
SFX - 0 ей [вф]
SFX - 0 ям [вф]
SFX - 0 ями [вф]
SFX - 0 ях [вф]
SFX - ь ей ь
SFX - ь ям ь
SFX - ь ями ь
SFX - ь ях ь
SFX . Y 5
SFX . е а ще
SFX . е 0 ще
SFX . е ам ще
SFX . е ами ще
SFX . е ах ще
