dictionaries/uk/index.dic
автомагістраль/D-
автотроф/1:$
агароза/%;
агрокалендар/4"(
алевроліт/1$
алергізація/%
алюмомідь/D-
антимонархічний/j+
антирадянщина/%;
антироман/1$
асфальтівка/%<
атомоплав/1$
аудіокоментар/4"(
бабище/QrS&f
багатель/D-
багатоплановий/j+
байкар/4"(
Бандурівка/%h
барліг/0u*w
басище/V.
батальйонер/1:$x
Батир/4"K
Батіг/0u*
батіг/0u*w
Батрадь/D!
безвічний/j+
безконфліктний/j+
безпредметний/j+
безуставичний/j+
бетоняр/4"(K
Бийгань/D!
Бикоза/%h
бік/0*w
бінормаль/D-
біосупермаркет/1$
Благодать/D!
блохоловка/%<
бляхар/4"(
божище/V.
бондар/4"(
бородище/QS&f
борсучище/V.
боязливий/j+
брахісинкліналь/D-
Бринь/D!
бронедивізія/%;
бронежилет/1:$
бунтар/4"(
вагар/4"(
Валера/%;h
веберметр/1:$
велич/D-
веприще/V.
верескотнява/%
Вересоч/D!
вертикальний/j+
вибивати/YyO'
вигуляти/Y'
виколихати/X'Y
виманювати/Xyt'
винар/4"(
виноградар/4"(
випомпувати/X'
вискубати/Y'
високохудожній/j+
Вись/D!
витівник/1:$x
витуплювати/Xyt'
виштурхувати/Xyt'
вібровтома/%
відеодоповідь/D-
відеотекар/4"(K
відколювати/Xyt'
відпрацьовувати/Xyt'
відріг/0u*w
відхльостувати/Xyt'
відьмар/4"(
відьмище/QrS&f
Вінож/D!
віолончель/D-
Вітава/%h
Віталік/1:$
вітрище/V.
вмазати/X'
вокальний/j+
волинкар/4"(
володар/4"(
волоть/D-
всукати/X'Y
вужачка/%
гадючище/QS&f
газель/D-!
газетяр/4"(K
газолін/1$
гармонь/D-
гвардія/%;
генсекретар/4"(K
геокомпонент/1:$
гідронавтка/%<h
гідроцентраль/D-
гіпнотичний/j+
глибокорозпушувач/1:$
Годинь/D!
голкар/4"(
головище/QS&f
головка/%<
гонець/4"(
господар/4"(
грибар/4"(
Грицеволя/%h
Грунь-Ташань/D!
ГТС-консорціум/1$
гуаш/D-
ґудзикар/4"(
двадцятикратний/j+
Дегтярка/%h
дерматоонколог/1:$
Дерть/D!
десексуалізація/%
Дехтяр/4"K
дзвонар/4"(
Дідівщина/%h
дійовий/j+
довжиномір/1:$
догвинчувати/Xyt'
домогосподар/4"(K
Домолоч/D!
дооцінювати/Xyt'
Дорогунь/D!
доцентровий/j+
дочесати/X'
дримбар/4"(
дружище/V.
Дуала/%h
Дудар/4"
екс'єпископ/1:$x
ексбоєць/4"(
екс-держсекретар/4"(K
екс-секретар/4"(
екстопмодель/D-!
екс-топ-модель/D-!
ексцеленція/%
електрохімік/1:$
емаль/D-
епатажний/j+
епідпоріг/0*w
етуаль/D-!
євробляхар/4"(K
євродемократ/1:$x
жабище/QS&f
Жденівка/%h
Жизель/D!
жимолость/D-
жнивар/4"(
Заболоть/D!
загальний/j+
загашувати/Xyt'
заквітчати/Y'
зальопати/Y'
замкар/4"(
замчище/V.Q
заперечний/j+
запечатувати/Xyt'
заповідь/D-
запор/1$
Заріг/0u*6
заскалювати/Xyt'
заткати/X'
Звіздаль/D!
зграбний/j+
здрібнювати/Xyt'
Зіґфрідівна/%h
злидар/4"(
золотар/4"(
ирод/1:$x
ідеальний/j+
Ікопоть/D!
інвентар/4(
іпостась/D-
іржати/]y)
Ірка/%h
іхтіандр/1:$x
кавунище/V.
Кагань/D!
календар/4"(
камерний/j+
Каратуль/D!
каротель/D-
картяр/4"(K
каталізатор/1:$
кваліметрія/%
квітникар/4"(
килимар/4"(
Кільчень/D!
кіновідповідь/D-
кіножурнал/1$
кінокалендар/4"(
кінопроповідь/D-
кінорік/0*
Клевань/D!
ковдрочка/%<
ковзаняр/4"(K
козар/4"(K
Колибань/D!
колодязник/1:$
конопляр/4"(K
конспіративний/j+
контрвідповідь/D-
корець/4"(3`d
Кормань/D!
коропище/V.
корчак/1:$
котляр/4"(K
котолюбка/%<h
Крамар/4"
кровотік/0*w
Кубань/D!
курсив/1$
кухар/4"(
кучер/1:$x4"(
кучерявий/j+Ee_
лапка/%<
лимар/4"(
лихвар/4"(
ліжникар/4"(K
лісоматеріал/1$
літзустріч/D-
літньошколяр/4"(K
Лодзь/D!
Лотар/4"
лушпелина/%;
Любань/D!
Людинь/D!
лялькар/4"(
макромодель/D-
малозадовільний/j+
маляр/1:$x4"(K
мамзель/D!
мангал/1:$
мегабаза/%;
медіа-постать/D-
мережати/YyO'
мерлан/1:$x
мимовільний/j+
мідяр/4"(K
Мізунь/D!
мікродуель/D-
мінарет/1$
мінея/%;
млинар/4"(K
мореходець/4"(
моріг/0*w
мотоподорож/D-
мугир/4"(
мудак/1:$x
мужичище/V.
надвідповідальний/j+
Назрань/D!
наколювати/Xyt'
Намібія/%h
напружений/j+
наростень/4"(
насікальник/1:$
натиньковувати/Xyt'
небідний/j+
невтримний/j+
незапальний/j+
нейтраль/D-
некоректний/j+
неорганізований/j+
непримиримий/j+
Несвіч/D!
нескромний/j+
нефальшивий/j+
новелета/%;
новемдецильйон/1:$
новинар/4"(
Новопристань/D!
нудьгар/4"(
оберсекретар/4"(
обклеювати/Xyt'
обопільний/j+
оборіг/0*w
обрость/D-
обстругати/X'Y
Онупрій/1:$
опційний/j+
оранжерейка/%<
Орель/D!
освистати/X'
Оселець/4"
осляр/4"(K
остріг/0*w
павучище/V.
падь/D-
папуас/1:$x
партсекретар/4"(K
паскудний/j+
пастир/4"(
пастораль/D-
Пацера/%
перейменовувати/Xyt'
переліг/0w*
перепин/1$
переполовинювати/Xyt'
Періг/0u*
Перм/D!
першопроходець/4"(3`d
Пиріг/0u*
пиріг/0u*w
писанкар/4"(
пищаль/D-
піддобрювати/Xyt'
підозрілий/j+
пікофарад/1:$
піньята/%;
планетезималь/D-
планетоліт/4"(
плотар/4"(
пов'язати/X'
повищипувати/X'
поводар/4"(
повстяр/4"(K
погрозливий/j+
позагортати/Y'
позащіпувати/X'
Познань/D!
поліетиленгліколь/1$
політдоповідь/D-
понадівати/Y'
поначіпляти/Y'
попереглядати/Y'
попооббивати/Y'
попутний/j+
поріг/0u*w
порномодель/D-!
порозкроювати/X'
посада/%;
постулювати/XytN'
Поштар/4"
превентор/1:$
престижний/j+
Пригідь/D!
пригорщ/D-
принижувати/Xyt'
Присторонь/D!
провіщувати/Xyt'
проводар/4"(
промисловий/j+
протоптати/X'
профітроль/1$
прясти/]y)=
прястися/]y)
псевдоготика/%;
псевдокоментар/4"(
псевдоспіраль/D-
псище/V.Q
пухир/4"(
радіоколоїд/1$
рать/D-
реалістичний/j+
рентгеноденситометрія/%
рибар/4"(
Ріг/0*
ріг/0w*u
рік/0*w6
Рогань/D!
розв'язний/j+
розкуповувати/Xyt'
розфасовник/1:$
розхлюпати/Y'
роль/D-
Руф/D!
Сабівка/%h
санкар/4"(
свекрушище/Q&f
секретар/4"(
сибаритка/%<h
Сизрань/D!
сі-мажор/1$
сіножать/D-
сконцентрований/j+
скотобоєць/4"(
словникар/4"(
снасть/D-
снопище/V.
собачище/V.Q
соліфлюкція/%
сомище/V.
спецбоєць/4"(
співгосподар/4"(K
сталь/D-
станковіст/1:$x
статс-секретар/4"(
стіг/0*w
стопочка/%<
сточувати/Xyt'
страшкий/j+
суміш/D-
супермодель/D-!
сутяжище/V.&f
сухар/4"(
сучище/QS&f
танталіт/1$
Тая/%;
теледуель/D-
телероль/D-
техсекретар/4"(K
Тисобикень/D!
Товщ/D!
токсичний/j+
томище/V.
топмодель/D-!
Тополівка/%h
траверс/1$
трембітар/4"(K
Трость/D!
турбомодель/D-
турище/V.
умотати/Y'
усячина/%;
феноменолог/1:$
фігляр/4"(K
фізкультурний/j+
фіт-модель/D-!
фотодрукар/4"(K
фотопанель/D-
фрагментаризація/%
хітин/1$
хлопчище/V.
Хотінь/D!
цезар/4"(
цитомегалія/%
ціль/D-
Чоботар/4"K1:
чоловічище/V.
чортище/V.
шапкар/4"(
шинкар/4"(
Шклинь/D!
шкоринка/%<
шрапнель/D-
штабелеукладач/1:$
штатний/j+
язичище/V.
Ятрань/D!
